lexiconAM.lexd
PATTERNS
Regular

LEXICON Roots(2)
ges(b)suw(t)boc(t)ceg(t) bel(p):a
col(t)*up(t)fef(t) *el(f):a-horizon
pe*(p)tup(f)pob(f)vip(p)fel(t) lef(t):a-ok
li(b)ves(p)baf(t)mog(p)fin(b) wal(p):aardvark
fuf(f)pog(t)bul(b)sal(b)up(t) fosh(f):aardwolf
nef(t)bag(f)fup(b) vir(f):ab
bop(f)pol(b)bag(t)rum(t) meg(p):aba
wub(t)fov(t)gib(b)som(t) nal(t):abaca
bic(p)su*(b)bash(p) feb(t):abacist
ro(f)ris(b)cuzh(f)pib(p)!ev(f) bi!(f):aback
pus(b)val(b)les(b) los(b):abactinal
fef(f)ses(f)bof(p)fof(t) wed(f):abacus
fil(t)sun(b)fop(t) map(t):abaddon
sec(p)tub(b)bul(f)shap(p)lov(f) da!(b):abaft
bel(f)sav(f)lev(b)vot(p) fiv(b):abalienate
cip(t)sew(b)fun(b)faf(b)sol(f) pov(b):abalienation
bof(b)ran(b)fezh(b)*ezh(t)car(b) bil(b):abalone
bos(t)bum(p)*el(b)fup(t)bol(t) lol(p):abampere
lep(b)les(t)gul(f)wib(f) wis(t):abandon
med(p)lis(p)lab(t) vis(p):abandoned
lis(f)!if(f)fezh(t) fob(f):abandonment
som(p)bi!(b)biv(f) wec(t):abarticulation
fef(t)leg(t)sum(b) bul(p):abase
sizh(f)kog(b)sus(t)fib(p) si(p):abased
buw(t)sur(p)les(f) bav(p):abasement
lof(b)sok(t)zhiv(b) fos(b):abash
lav(f)tob(t)bok(b)tac(t) shesh(b):abashed
bil(b)dush(p)wal(b)sap(f) sew(f):abashment
tes(f)gis(b)peb(p)vov(t)fof(b) lel(t):abasia
fef(p)fas(f)lub(p)fel(t) faf(p):abasic
bab(p)pid(p)sol(f)nop(t) paf(b):abate
gum(t)vof(t)sezh(t)bip(b)les(b) if(b):abatement
ful(f)gis(t)bol(t)vul(f) gosh(t):abating
fe(f)leb(b)nup(b)vos(p)bub(p) ses(t):abatis
fof(t)peb(b)gig(p)bov(t) fig(f):abatjou
bab(t)bes(f)nop(f) lac(b):abattis
ref(t)bul(t)suf(f) fes(t):abattoir
fav(f)fof(p)fup(f)won(b) sop(f):abaxial
sic(p)tug(b)lil(f) fub(f):abba
gav(p)vas(t)bizh(t) fal(t):abbacy
vel(t)lof(b)fub(t)fit(b) vef(b):abbatial
!oc(f)ur(t)sif(t) lar(t):abbatical
cav(p)pof(t)fal(t) dag(f):abbatis
bar(t)was(t)fe(f) pev(b):abbe
vif(f)lap(b)geg(f)kig(t) fub(p):abbess
sep(t)wop(b)pod(f) va!(p):abbey
big(b)fof(p)fiv(b) fog(t):abbot
fep(f)vec(f)*as(f)fo(f)fip(t) fev(p):abbreviate
ge!(p)biv(p)vag(p)shi!(b)lo*(p) lap(t):abbreviated
vo!(t)gi*(b)lul(f)siw(t) uc(f):abbreviation
lav(f)pup(p)sor(f)vog(b)wos(b) sis(t):abbreviature
can(t)bal(t)pel(f) pes(t):abc
vag(p)fem(t)of(t)fif(p) nil(t):abcoulomb
ruf(t)*os(t)fif(b)vof(p)cut(b) gel(p):abdal
tag(f)ges(b)vow(t)fec(p)lus(b) ses(t):abderite
pil(p)bal(f)fes(t) sub(t):abdicable
rug(b)gal(p)fel(f)fo!(f)sep(p) sof(t):abdicant
siw(p)sid(p)bus(b) tis(b):abdicate
nul(b)fov(p)lef(t) lup(f):abdication
bip(t)fes(b)fev(p)fov(f)paf(p) i(b):abdicator
lub(p)gec(b)!ash(p)shes(f)fum(b) kif(t):abditory
law(p)gup(t)sof(t) leg(t):abditos
leg(b)tab(p)mis(p) nip(p):abdomen
vop(f)se!(f)bel(f) fob(b):abdominal
paw(f)gov(b)sizh(p)vuf(t)beg(b) shes(f):abdominocentesis
kuzh(t)vas(p)faf(t)deb(b) pit(t):abdominoscope
lag(p)feb(t)saf(t) sev(t):abdominoscopy
nop(f)mif(f)if(b)zhov(p)zhol(t) deb(p):abdominous
bash(b)luv(t)lov(b)sif(p)dol(p) se*(t):abdominousness
lav(p)geb(p)sep(b)wo(t)!us(f) luw(p):abdominovesical
wep(b)fuk(p)cis(b) shog(t):abduce
sos(p)mob(p)zhuf(p)nep(p)bil(p) ve(b):abducent
siv(t)fug(p)pul(b) bip(t):abduct
gev(p)sif(p)shif(t)vag(p) gel(p):abduction
lul(t)baf(b)fir(b) fub(f):abductive
puv(t)!ef(p)wic(t)nif(b) fed(f):abductor
losh(t)fen(t)vup(p)cat(p)shov(f) fof(b):abeam
veg(b)ko(f)up(t) beb(f):abecedarian
losh(t)fen(t)vup(p)cat(p)shov(f) fof(b):abecedarius
fis(t)sep(p)fil(p) vaf(b):abecedary
mos(f)luv(p)ped(b)*ak(p) bon(t):abed
vol(t)nosh(f)vus(p)dab(p)!el(b) lub(b):abel
lap(f)gash(t)sil(f) fis(b):abelia
sab(f)zhazh(t)got(b) nuw(p):abelmoschus
meb(p)vub(p)fib(f) wal(t):abelmosk
pesh(b)laf(p)cuf(b)fa!(b) pof(f):abends
lap(f)lal(t)fiv(b)va*(b)*ad(t) shap(p):aber
bas(f)bozh(t)pup(p)bim(p) fil(t):aberdeen
pil(f)no*(f)bak(f)vof(f)gop(t) pab(b):aberdevine
bev(f)pok(t)sub(p) feg(p):aberrance
fuf(p)cib(t)sil(p)big(t)pap(t) sif(p):aberrant
nog(p)mab(b)kazh(b)feb(t) vin(t):aberration
!uv(b)pif(p)fav(f)zham(t)sa*(t) ser(t):abest
fip(f)gos(b)boc(t)lul(b) gub(b):abet
pa(t)sob(p)seb(t) pozh(b):abetalipoproteinemia
sul(t)seb(p)!at(b)*av(f)lod(b) bag(b):abetment
kif(p)sis(f)fet(b)lob(p) wuf(b):abettor
fef(p)pab(p)lip(b)lal(t) geb(t):abeunt
ab(t)fub(t)puv(t) rib(b):abeyance
ka*(b)pup(t)bos(p)fuv(p) bif(p):abeyant
cup(p)buv(f)lel(b)bot(p)sol(p) sav(t):abfarad
fip(f)gos(b)boc(t)lul(b) gub(b):abhenry
bab(b)seg(f)gel(p)mob(b)vef(b) guf(t):abhor
bus(p)mal(t)kas(f)sav(b)sig(p) te*(p):abhorrence
bap(t)le(b)ve!(t)cul(t) gaf(t):abhorrent
gip(f)lip(t)puzh(t)tis(b) gul(f):abhorrer
bos(b)buv(t)shec(t)shul(f)sib(b) gov(f):abibis
fib(p)nig(p)fev(b)gek(t)fif(f) ri(b):abidance
pel(b)vuc(t)les(p) fes(b):abide
fas(b)fil(f)faf(f)pal(t) roc(b):abiding
bel(f)beg(t)ful(t)bub(b) bo*(p):abidjan
gek(t)bef(t)shel(f)fif(b)suk(b) sef(b):abience
vog(f)ses(p)vish(t) nub(f):abient
wiw(f)bib(t)fuf(p)sob(p) fus(f):abies
pal(p)zho!(p)fog(b)fut(f) lus(b):abigail
sol(f)fam(b)wul(p)zhaf(f)zhuf(b) fos(b):abiit
ip(f)naf(f)bus(p)lil(b) lef(t):abilities
vod(b)vup(f)wot(p) zhuf(t):ability
luv(f)buf(b)pig(t)id(b)soc(p) bof(b):abiogenesis
let(p)bezh(f)but(p) lul(p):abiogenetic
bev(p)tov(f)buf(t) dush(f):abiogenist
!iw(f)fe(p)fer(f)bob(t) faf(b):abiotrophy
sov(f)lo!(f)fum(t) zhazh(p):abito
lel(f)ral(p)pus(f) sib(p):abject
nab(t)lel(f)nif(f)cal(f)sib(p) zhes(t):abjection
vef(p)*if(t)pe!(p) gov(f):abjectly
feb(t)fut(f)tel(p)pop(t)saw(f) dop(f):abjectness
vaf(p)pap(f)feg(b)fog(b)rav(f) meg(f):abjunction
vom(t)baf(t)fef(b) ful(t):abjuration
buf(p)seg(b)cus(f)fek(b) bes(f):abjurationabjurement
mob(t)besh(p)fub(b)lut(f) kal(b):abjure
pub(p)zhav(p)fuf(p)pug(p) *iw(p):abkari
zhal(p)vos(b)feb(f)sub(t) biv(b):ablactation
vos(f)wad(f)lin(b)wag(t) fef(t):ablated
lub(b)bol(b)leg(t)nel(t) mof(f):ablation
fuf(t)vad(t)sos(t)val(b) wag(b):ablative
vis(t)*il(f)bap(p) pan(p):ablaut
som(p)bi!(b)biv(f) wec(t):ablaze
loc(t)sag(p)now(f)pon(f)feg(t) fof(p):ablaze(p)
sid(t)*el(b)fos(b) fug(f):able
se(f)fef(b)vec(p)fil(p) fap(b):ablebodied
loc(b)pol(t)si*(t)gib(b)bef(p) fif(t):ablegate
rob(t)lev(f)*ev(f)nep(p) fos(b):ableism
mar(p)lif(f)beb(p)pu(t)zhal(p) lav(f):ableness
gup(b)sis(b)bub(p)mew(b) sac(p):ablepharia
fef(b)val(f)wol(f)fis(p) pol(t):ablepsia
sap(b)se*(b)is(p) lis(b):ablepsy
niw(b)bif(f)sag(p)fif(b) nul(f):abloom
fa*(p)zhib(f)los(p)lav(t)zhis(f) vom(b):ablude
sin(b)gif(p)pag(f)bib(t) lav(t):ablution
fas(p)pob(b)us(t)gog(p) tub(t):ablutionary
fug(t)fib(b)fezh(b)vof(f) guf(b):abnaki
pol(b)sot(t)suc(b) tif(f):abnegation
tef(f)rag(t)fat(f)beg(t) bul(p):abnegator
suf(f)wil(p)wif(t)gev(p)gof(p) !er(p):abnormal
bop(t)zhas(t)gup(p)gos(f)fob(f) gev(f):abnormality
wuv(t)teg(t)lid(p)su(t) *up(t):abnormalize
fib(t)pob(b)bif(t)set(f) sub(f):abnormally
lab(p)bef(f)lap(b) lap(b):abnormis
gup(b)fef(f)vof(b) lob(b):abnormity
ba*(b)sek(f)bal(p) leb(p):abnormous
bo(b)vov(f)mav(b)gib(f)sof(p) kar(b):aboard
las(p)pag(f)vef(t)bub(b) laf(p):abocclusion
sev(b)fev(t)lab(p) pi(b):abode
sob(f)!id(b)wof(p) kil(f):abodement
fip(f)gib(b)lub(b) so!(p):aboding
nud(p)ces(t)shaf(t)sid(t) cuf(f):abohm
bil(t)kif(b)gac(t)wek(b) vizh(p):aboideau
lip(t)sot(f)buv(t)bib(t)nol(t) vil(p):abois
ip(t)zhip(f)*ab(t)shob(b) kav(t):aboiteau
rof(b)zhem(t)zhas(t) bal(f):abolengo
vap(f)cor(t)sid(p)so!(b) e(b):abolish
*ub(t)*ef(p)*of(f)vir(t)be(p) fuzh(b):abolishable
rop(p)bug(p)bep(t) cut(b):abolishment
gid(f)*ok(t)viv(p)vuf(b)fev(b) bol(f):abolition
sis(t)shak(b)des(p) fep(f):abolitionary
*an(t)sul(b)sal(f) bum(f):abolitionism
vuf(p)vit(f)tof(p) sef(p):abolitionist
fef(b)fil(t)fof(f)saf(t) luf(f):abolitionize
fol(p)pup(p)sof(t)seb(f)vap(b) vud(t):abomasal
lop(p)shok(b)suv(b)nol(b) nas(t):abomasum
sif(p)gif(p)*um(p) lob(p):abominable
das(p)les(p)nif(t)tiv(b) fof(f):abominate
buf(p)lul(f)fol(p)fav(t)fif(p) rod(p):abomination
bef(b)nag(t)feb(b)fas(b) pes(b):abominator
kum(f)vas(b)*ig(f)shaf(b)lul(t) fi(p):aborad
waf(p)bol(t)lov(t) vosh(f):aboral
fap(b)lam(b)lub(t)vag(p)bul(p) lof(b):abord
pu(f)ful(t)meg(t)fob(f)bif(p) fo!(p):aboriginal
lif(b)gin(t)vif(f) gon(b):aborigine
fis(f)bid(f)lel(b) sep(t):aborigines
fos(t)mev(t)bos(f)bil(t)fob(b) kom(p):aborning
gis(p)gal(t)luf(t)fog(b) muf(b):abort
fel(t)bos(t)mof(p)pes(b)vav(p) af(p):aborticide
bis(f)kal(f)she(f)vew(t) fum(t):abortifacient
fof(f)ob(b)fozh(f) shal(f):abortion
gi*(f)bav(f)mep(p)sup(f) far(b):abortionist
fe*(p)if(p)cis(b)lis(f) vos(p):abortive
fuf(f)!of(f)tug(f)mab(b) kof(p):abortively
dob(p)sish(f)ler(f) pog(b):abortus
vip(f)lac(p)dub(b)baf(t)fip(t) ran(b):abound
gun(b)sep(b)vol(b)bog(p) vof(f):abounding
sop(b)lif(t)lev(p) lor(t):about
zhas(b)bo(b)nap(p)bed(f)lev(t) miv(t):about(p)
*is(f)fed(t)sish(b) sab(p):about-face
fof(b)sar(b)bef(b)fis(f)!of(p) gub(f):abouts
ceb(p)laf(p)piv(t) lar(b):above
sev(p)bif(t)fef(p)pof(t)sek(t) *er(t):above-mentioned
fob(t)rap(b)bib(t)vuf(t) sup(f):aboveboard
ra*(t)lop(p)gim(t)vov(b) fof(p):aboveground
bil(t)bis(b)rif(t)zhif(p)lab(t) sov(p):abovementioned
sor(t)ab(t)fa!(b)bol(p) sol(b):abovesaid
gush(t)fo!(b)bup(t)liv(p) deg(t):abovestairs
li*(p)vub(t)vaf(p)vab(f)fid(t) vow(f):abra
!ol(t)pol(f)uk(b)caf(b) beg(p):abracadabra
lop(b)kel(f)vup(f) bos(p):abrachia
pug(t)nav(f)peg(f)rob(t)mip(p) pob(p):abrade
shel(t)fis(p)fuf(t) *ush(p):abraded
tav(f)beg(f)fizh(p)vak(b)vop(f) oc(f):abrader
fo(p)bosh(t)sum(p)fis(t) leg(b):abraham
fuf(p)sug(t)baf(t) sob(b):abramis
nub(t)ber(t)nab(p)pub(t)sas(f) sib(p):abranchiate
kim(t)*a!(t)val(f)ret(b) vac(f):abrasion
pel(f)wif(p)res(p)fep(b)sav(b) fat(t):abrasive
sos(t)sef(t)tog(b)tef(f)nar(t) fuf(t):abreast
kuv(f)til(b)pur(t) cor(p):abrege
tul(p)pel(b)va!(f) fif(t):abreption
dar(f)sod(t)kof(b)pezh(f) lal(b):abridge
!ab(p)bam(b)gib(b)lul(p) vas(t):abridged
vof(f)shif(b)las(f)gep(f) lel(t):abridger
cil(t)bob(f)vud(t)!uf(f) lil(f):abridgment
go(f)pes(p)vaf(t) del(p):abroach
fub(f)lif(b)sud(p)las(t) bal(t):abroad
*ug(b)cep(t)giv(f)sas(p)bif(f) fel(t):abrocoma
fel(p)fu!(t)tob(p)fab(t) sif(b):abrocome
kof(t)feb(b)fif(p)doc(b)naf(b) liv(b):abrogate
puzh(p)bil(t)beg(f) fef(t):abrogated
nol(b)pat(p)pef(p) bel(p):abrogation
pil(t)!ub(p)baf(b)lun(t) pep(b):abronia
bov(b)e(b)cov(p) fal(f):abrupt
sa*(p)fib(f)fif(t)sesh(t) fap(p):abruption
tef(f)*ul(f)gib(p) vazh(f):abruptly
fil(b)faf(t)fev(t)fos(f)su*(b) rag(b):abruptness
bet(f)let(b)vos(f) bul(p):abruzzi
nif(b)fiv(b)ful(p) lozh(p):abscess
sif(b)bip(t)vuzh(f)fof(p) !am(t):abscessed
bul(b)sur(p)veg(t)mep(f) pef(f):abscind
bash(f)sil(b)maf(p)lef(f)ve!(b) biv(t):abscision
sas(t)nub(b)feb(p)sig(f) ges(f):abscissa
bul(f)lif(t)nu!(p) wev(f):abscission
bos(p)cuc(p)vub(t) tug(t):abscond
zhas(b)bo(b)nap(p)bed(f)lev(t) miv(t):absconder
lag(b)buf(t)pi!(p) *av(f):abscondment
kir(f)sush(b)pis(f)*is(b) gib(f):absence
lug(f)bizh(f)!os(p)bip(f) *el(f):absens
sob(f)push(t)bi*(t)lev(f) geg(p):absent
pes(p)bus(f)vib(b)fig(t)ses(b) ful(f):absentee
fuc(f)bob(t)log(t) sip(f):absenteeism
lir(f)zhed(p)fub(p)bo!(t) baf(p):absently
fag(p)sab(f)vif(b) fub(t):absentminded
fas(b)cub(f)pu*(b)tuf(f)fog(f) pas(f):absentmindedness
ref(t)lab(p)set(b) bu!(p):absento
gesh(t)dob(p)dop(b)sug(f)fil(f) nef(p):absents
bap(f)let(b)pul(f)pif(b)lap(b) rod(b):absinth
lav(p)for(t)vep(t)pel(f) los(f):absinthe
sab(f)mip(f)sus(p) sub(b):absolute
pum(f)saf(b)wos(t) fol(b):absolutely
sit(t)pec(t)seb(b) lib(t):absoluteness
lav(p)put(f)sip(t) *ab(t):absolution
fub(f)zhaf(f)wo*(p)vek(f)wof(p) pow(f):absolutism
feg(b)nes(t)ves(f)gul(t)shos(b) *u*(b):absolutist
sesh(b)lag(t)zhin(t) nef(p):absolve
bav(f)sol(t)sazh(p)kup(t) ga(p):absolved
nas(f)pos(p)gog(b)fav(p)gop(f) vol(f):absolver
wak(p)bob(b)sec(p)pak(f)fa*(f) fuf(f):absolvitory
liv(b)*u*(t)dar(t)bas(t)ros(f) la!(p):absolvitur
fob(p)vaw(f)lid(t)ti(f)*ip(f) !as(b):absonant
sil(p)fir(b)vew(p) fis(p):absonous
bep(t)cug(p)mif(t)push(t) gal(t):absorb
gil(f)mil(t)lag(b)zhob(t) sa(b):absorbable
gop(f)tel(b)tan(p) shaf(b):absorbate
sab(f)gesh(f)gav(f)fal(f)if(b) lul(b):absorbed
sev(f)fel(p)bus(t) feb(p):absorbefacient
vuf(f)vic(f)lab(f)fu!(t)fif(t) buf(p):absorbency
lud(f)gup(t)vut(b)buf(t)lal(b) pel(p):absorbent
fis(f)dil(b)fos(b)vesh(t) sof(t):absorber
law(b)bes(p)lef(t) vif(p):absorbing
shuk(f)bif(f)baf(f) fug(p):absorption
push(p)fav(t)pa!(t) ben(b):absorptivity
!azh(f)shud(b)fel(t)lev(b)vel(b) *od(t):absquatulate
